Utah statutes.
76-3-206.   Capital felony -- Penalties.

(1)  A person who has pled guilty to or been convicted of a capital felony shall be sentenced in accordance with Section 76-3-207.  That sentence shall be death, an indeterminate prison term of not less than 25 years and which may be for life, or, on or after April 27, 1992, life in prison without parole.

(2) (a)  The judgment of conviction and sentence of death is subject to automatic review by the Utah State Supreme Court within 60 days after certification by the sentencing court of the entire record unless time is extended an additional period not to exceed 30 days by the Utah State Supreme Court for good cause shown.

(b)  The review by the Utah State Supreme Court has priority over all other cases and shall be heard in accordance with rules promulgated by the Utah State Supreme Court.



Amended by Chapter 76, 2009 General Session

